Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education for the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin School unemployment aid. new text end new text begin (a) For school unemployment aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.995: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 105,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) This appropriation is subject to the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 124D.995. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation. new text end